Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.350

Removal of guardian for adult—Appointment of successor.

(1) The court may remove a guardian for an adult for failure to perform the guardian's duties or for other good cause and appoint a successor guardian to assume the duties of guardian.

(2) The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to remove a guardian for an adult and appoint a successor guardian on:

(a) Petition of the adult, guardian, or person interested in the welfare of the adult, which contains allegations that, if true, would support a reasonable belief that removal of the guardian and appointment of a successor guardian may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed during the preceding six months;

(b) Communication from the adult, guardian, or person interested in the welfare of the adult which supports a reasonable belief that removal of the guardian and appointment of a successor guardian may be appropriate; or

(c) Determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the adult.

(3) Notice of a hearing under subsection (2)(a) of this section and notice of the adult subject to guardianship's right to be represented at the hearing by counsel of the individual's choosing must be given to the adult subject to guardianship, the guardian, and any other person the court determines.

(4) An adult subject to guardianship who seeks to remove the guardian and have a successor guardian appointed has the right to choose an attorney to represent the adult in this matter. The court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to the attorney for the adult as provided in RCW 11.130.100.

(5) In selecting a successor guardian for an adult, the court shall follow the priorities under RCW 11.130.305.

(6) Not later than fourteen days after appointing a successor guardian, the successor guardian shall give notice of the appointment to the adult subject to guardianship and any person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.310(5) or a subsequent order.

[ 2019 c 437 s 319.]